Louisiana, session 2026, HB291.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1828(D) and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
22:1828(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1828. Provider claim payment and information protection
* * *
D. A health insurance issuer shall not impose any monetary reductions in the
payment of claims, or suspend or terminate a provider agreement, with respect to any
licensed healthcare facility that is a participating provider based solely on the
network or participating status of another healthcare provider that contributes to any
component of care to a patient at the licensed healthcare facility. The provisions of
this Subsection shall not apply to the Office of Group Benefits.
D. E. The provisions of this Section shall not be waived by contract, and any
contractual clause in conflict with the provisions of this Section or that purport to
waive the requirements of this Section is void.
E. F. Any violation of the provisions of this Section shall be declared and
considered to be unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or
practices in the business of insurance and subject to the provisions of Part IV of
Chapter 7 of this Title.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 291 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.